California statutes. Education Code
Each employer shall deduct from the creditable compensation of members employed by the employer the member contributions required by this part and shall remit to the system those contributions plus the employer contributions required by this part and Section 44987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 482, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.

Each county superintendent, district superintendent, chancellor of a community college district, or other employing agency that reports directly to the system shall draw requisitions for contributions required by Sections 22901, 22901.7, 22950, and 22950.5 in favor of the State Teachers’ Retirement System, and the requisitions, when allowed and signed by the county auditor, shall constitute a warrant against the county treasury. The county superintendent, district superintendent, chancellor of a community college district, or other employing agency thereupon shall forward the warrants to the board in the system’s headquarters office. The amounts received shall be deposited immediately in the State Treasury to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 16.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.5.

(a) All contributions due to the system by an employer under this part shall be paid by an electronic funds transfer method through an automated clearinghouse as prescribed by the board. This payment requirement is effective upon authorization by the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, “automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts. 

(c) An employer that is unable, for good
 cause, to comply with subdivision (a) may apply to the board for a waiver that allows the employer to pay in an alternate manner as prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 2052)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.

Member and employer contributions required by this part and Section 44987 are due in the office of the system five working days immediately following the period covered by the monthly report upon which the compensation earned during the period is being reported and from and upon which the contributions are due. Payments shall be delinquent on the sixth working day thereafter and regular interest on delinquent payments shall begin to accrue as of that day. The board shall authorize estimated payments of not less than 95 percent of the contributions due, and, in that case, the balance of contributions payable shall be due in the office of the system no more than 15 working days following the period covered by the monthly report upon which the contributions are based. This additional payment shall be delinquent on the 16th working day thereafter, and regular interest shall begin to accrue as of that day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 482, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.5.

Member and employer contributions from school districts conducting a year-round school operation or a continuous school program shall be reported as part of the school year in which the service began.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.

(a) If a county superintendent of schools or employing agency or school district or community college district that reports directly to the system fails to make payment of contributions as provided in Section 23002, the board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess penalties.

(b) The board shall, in accordance with regulations, charge regular interest on any delinquent contributions under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 249, Sec. 5.   (AB 654)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

23004.

The county superintendent of schools or employing agency shall, or a school district or community college district may, with approval of the board, submit a report monthly to the system containing information as the board may require in the administration of the plan. That monthly report shall be submitted electronically in an encrypted format provided by the system that ensures the security of the transmitted member data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 655, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23005.

Monthly reports are due in the office of the system 30 calendar days immediately following the month in which the compensation being reported under this part was earned, and are delinquent 15 calendar days immediately thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23006.

(a) If a county superintendent of schools or employing agency or school district or community college district that reports directly to the system, submits monthly reports, as specified by Section 23004, late, as defined in Section 23005, or in unacceptable form, the board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess penalties.

(b) The board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess penalties, based on the sum of the employer and employee contributions required under this part by the report, for late or unacceptable submission of reports, at a rate of interest equal to the regular interest rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 7.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23007.

If any county superintendent, district superintendent, chancellor of a community college district, or other employing agency that reports directly to the system fails to make payment of any assessment by the board, the Controller shall, upon order of the board, withhold subsequent payments from the State School Fund to the county for deposit in the county school service fund or, upon the request of a county superintendent of schools to the county auditor, he or she shall withhold payments to a school district for deposit in the district general fund until the contributions and report are received in acceptable form in the office of the system and the board directs the Controller to make those payments, less the amount of the assessments to the county that would have
 been paid had no payments been withheld. The Controller shall then pay to the system the amount of the assessments withheld for deposit in the State Treasury to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 10.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

23008.

(a) If more or less than the required contributions specified in this part and Section 44987 are paid to the system based on any payment of creditable compensation to a member, proper adjustments shall be made on a monthly report, by the county superintendent, district superintendent, chancellor of a community college district, or other employing agency who submitted the report, within 60 days after discovery or notification by the system and any refunds shall be made to the member within the same time period by the employing agency.

(b) The board shall, in accordance with regulations, assess penalties for late or improper adjustments pursuant to Section 23006. These penalties shall be no more than the regular interest as
 defined in Section 22162. The penalty so assessed shall be deemed interest earned in the year in which it was received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 11.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

23009.

The board, if in the interest of the plan, may, in connection with adjustments to the required contributions referred to in Section 23008, receive or make payments directly from or to the member or beneficiary with interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23010.

A person or entity that reports directly to the system that is assessed penalties or interest pursuant to Section 23003, 23006, or 23008 may appeal the assessed penalties or interest subject to the appeals process established pursuant to Section 22219.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 249, Sec. 8.   (AB 654)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

23011.

Penalties and interest due to the system pursuant to Section 23003, 23006, or 23008 are additional required contributions that, when received, shall be deposited to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund and treated in the same manner as other contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 13.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23012.

(a) For the purpose of remitting contributions, assessments, or any other payment required by the system, the county superintendent of schools that reports directly to the system may, on an annual basis or as otherwise directed by the system, draw requisitions against the county school service fund and the funds of the county’s respective employing agencies in amounts equal to the total required to be paid by the employing agency. 

(b) Additionally, the county superintendent of schools may draw requisitions against the county school service fund and the funds of the county’s respective employing agencies, as applicable, in amounts necessary for recovering payments made
 pursuant to Section 24616.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 754, Sec. 9.   (AB 1667)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Refund of Contributions [23100. - 23107.]

23100.

(a) Upon termination of employment, a member may elect to be paid, pursuant to this part, each of the following:

(1) The member’s accumulated retirement contributions made after June 30, 1935.

(2) The member’s accumulated annuity deposit contributions.

(3) An amount equal to the balance of credits in the member’s Defined Benefit Supplement account.

(b) Accumulated retirement contributions and accumulated annuity deposit contributions shall include credited interest through the date of
 payment.

(c) Accumulated retirement contributions shall be reduced by the amount of retirement or disability benefits paid to a member pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 8.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23101.

(a) When a member’s accumulated retirement contributions are refunded, as provided in Section 23100, all rights to benefits pertaining to the service credit represented by those contributions under this part are forfeited. Those rights and benefits, based upon service performed prior to refund, shall not be restored until the member has redeposited the total of the refunded accumulated retirement contributions, and paid the regular interest thereon as provided in Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 23200).

(b) In addition to the rights and benefits described in subdivision (a), any beneficiary designation made by a member pursuant to Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 23300) and
 Chapter 28 (commencing with Section 24300) under this part shall be invalidated upon the refund of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 9.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23102.

Prior to the system paying a refund of accumulated retirement contributions under this part, the employer shall certify that the member’s employment has been terminated in a format prescribed by the system unless the employment was terminated 12 months or more prior to the date the refund application is received by the system’s headquarters office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 15.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23103.

Refunds to a member shall be made upon request of the member on a properly executed form prescribed by the system, or may be made without a request if it is determined by the board that the member’s employment is permanently terminated and the member does not have enough credited service under the Defined Benefit Program to qualify for service retirement under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 703, Sec. 10.   (SB 349)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23104.

(a) Deposit in the United States mail of an initial warrant drawn as directed by the member as a refund of contributions upon termination of employment, and addressed to the address directed by the member, constitutes a return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions under this part. In lieu of an initial warrant, the system may initiate a disbursement by electronic funds transfer to a specific account at a financial institution as directed by the member as a refund of contributions upon termination of employment, which shall constitute a return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions under this part.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), if the member
 has elected on a form provided by the system to transfer all or a specified portion of the accumulated retirement contributions that are eligible for direct trustee-to-trustee transfer to the trustee of a qualified plan under Section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 402), deposit in the United States mail of a notice that the requested transfer has been made constitutes a return of the member’s accumulated retirement contributions under this part.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (e), for refunds not involving direct trustee-to-trustee transfers, if the member returns the total gross distribution amount to the system’s headquarters office within 30 days from the mailing date, the refund shall be canceled and the person shall be restored as a member of the Defined Benefit Program with all the rights and
 privileges under this part restored.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), for refunds involving direct trustee-to-trustee transfers, if the member returns the warrant drawn to the trustee of the qualified plan or the trustee returns the amount of the qualified refund and, if applicable, any additional amounts necessary to equal, but in no event to exceed, the total gross distribution amount to the system’s headquarters office within 30 days from the mailing date, the refund shall be canceled and the person shall be restored as a member of the Defined Benefit Program with all the rights and privileges under this part restored.

(e) The mode of notice described in subdivision (b) and the measurement of time within which the return of total gross distribution amounts described in
 subdivisions (c) and (d) shall be made are subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 25.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

23106.

If a member ceases to be entitled to credit for service in the Defined Benefit Program because the member has become entitled to credit for that service in another retirement system supported wholly or in part by funds of the United States government, or any state government or political subdivision thereof, the member is entitled to a refund of the accumulated retirement contributions made during the period for which he or she is entitled to credit in the other retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23107.

Any member of the Defined Benefit Program without terminating membership in the program and upon making application on forms provided by the system shall be paid a refund of the accumulated annuity deposit contributions under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Redeposit of Contributions [23200. - 23203.]

23200.

(a) If a person, whose accumulated retirement contributions have been refunded, again becomes a member of the Defined Benefit Program or is subject to Section 23201, the person may request to redeposit all or a portion of those contributions with regular interest from the date of refund to the date the system receives the request to redeposit.

(b) If a nonmember spouse, as defined in Section 22651, withdraws accumulated contributions in accordance with Section 22661, the member may redeposit all or a portion of those contributions pursuant to subdivision (a), providing they are not receiving an allowance under Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100) or Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 24201).

(c) If a member requests to redeposit a portion of all accumulated retirement contributions that were previously refunded subject to requirements imposed by the board, the member shall receive pro rata service credit in proportion to the amount redeposited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23201.

Any person whose accumulated retirement contributions were refunded, who wishes to establish concurrent membership, and who has received, or will qualify to receive, a retirement allowance from one or more of the retirement systems defined in Section 22115.2, may request to redeposit all or a portion of the accumulated retirement contributions that were refunded, with regular interest from the date of refund to the date the system receives the request to redeposit, without being employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage under the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 117, Sec. 3.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23202.

(a) An election pursuant to Section 23200 to redeposit accumulated retirement contributions may be made by a member anytime prior to the effective date of the member’s retirement under this part.

(b) An election to redeposit accumulated retirement contributions returned to the member shall be considered as an election to repay accumulated retirement contributions previously returned, up to but not exceeding the amount required to restore the total service credit returned, under the provisions of this chapter. A member shall sign and return the completed election to repay accumulated retirement contributions from the system to redeposit at a specific cost no later than 35 calendar days from the date of the offer.

(c) If any payment due because of this election is not received at the system’s headquarters office within 120 calendar days of its due date, the election shall be canceled. Upon the cancellation of election, the member shall receive credit for the payments made under the election or, at the request of the member, those payments shall be returned.

(d) If the election is canceled, the member may at any time prior to the effective date of retirement under this part, again elect to redeposit accumulated retirement contributions previously withdrawn or returned, in accordance with Section 23200 and all the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 117, Sec. 4.   (AB 2770)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23203.

(a) A member who elects to redeposit refunded accumulated retirement contributions shall pay, prior to retirement, all contributions and interest as determined under Section 23200.

(b) If the system is unable to inform the member or beneficiary of the amount required to redeposit the refunded accumulated retirement contributions prior to the effective date of the applicable allowance, the member or beneficiary may make the required payment within 30 working days after the date of mailing of the statement of contributions and interest required or the effective date of the appropriate allowance, whichever is later, except as provided in subdivision
 (d). The payment shall be paid in full before a member or beneficiary receives any adjustment in the appropriate allowance due because of that payment.

(c) Redeposit of refunded accumulated retirement contributions shall be made in one sum, or in not more than 120 monthly installments, not to exceed ten years, provided that no installment, except the final installment, is less than twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) The measurement of time within which a redeposit described in subdivision (b) shall be made is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 459, Sec. 8.   (AB 989)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 20. Beneficiary Designation [23300. - 23304.]

23300.

(a) A member of the Defined Benefit Program may designate a beneficiary to receive benefits payable under this part upon the member’s death. A beneficiary designation may not be made in derogation of a community property interest of a nonmember spouse, as defined by Section 25000.9, with respect to service or contributions credited under this part, unless the nonmember spouse has previously obtained an alternative order pursuant to Section 2610 of the Family Code.

(b) A member’s beneficiary designation for benefits payable under the Defined Benefit Program, including a designation made pursuant to Section 24300 or 24300.1, shall also apply to benefits payable under the Defined
 Benefit Supplement Program. A beneficiary designation shall be in writing on a form prescribed by the system and executed by the member.

(c) A beneficiary designation shall not be valid unless it is received in the system’s headquarters office prior to the member’s death.

(d) A member may change or revoke a beneficiary designation at any time by making a new designation pursuant to this section.

(e) This section is not applicable to the designation of an option beneficiary or an annuity beneficiary under this part.

(f) An option beneficiary may designate a death beneficiary who would, upon the death of the option beneficiary, be entitled to receive the option beneficiary’s accrued monthly allowance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 558, Sec. 18.   (AB 1379)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23301.

A corporation, trust, charitable organization, parochial institution, or public entity may be designated as a beneficiary under this part, but they shall not be designated as option beneficiaries, except a trust as defined in Section 22149.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 96, Sec. 16.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23302.

Payment under this part to a beneficiary designated in the form on file in the system at the date of death by a warrant drawn prior to any claim under community property rights shall constitute full discharge of any and all liability of the board, system, and plan by reason of the member’s death.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23303.

(a) If the whereabouts of the designated beneficiary cannot be determined, or if the beneficiary is the estate of the deceased person, the board may pay to the undertaker who conducted the funeral, or to any person who, or any organization that, has paid the undertaker from funds owned by the person or organization, in its discretion all or a portion of any amount payable under this part, but not to exceed the funeral expenses of the deceased person, or the portion of the expenses paid by the person or organization, as evidenced by the sworn itemized statement of the undertaker, person, or organization and by any other documents the board may require.

(b) The payment shall be in full and complete discharge and acquittance of the board, system, and plan up to the amount paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23304.

If no beneficiary designation is in effect on the date of death, any benefit payable under this part shall be paid to the estate of the member. Payment pursuant to the board’s determination in good faith upon evidence satisfactory to it of the existence, identity or other facts relating to entitlement of persons under this section shall constitute a complete discharge and release of the system and plan from liability for the benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 137.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 21. Pre-1972 Benefits [23400. - 23404.]

23400.

(a) If, prior to attaining the age of 55 years, a person who is entitled to receive a retirement allowance because of his or her retirement for disability prior to July 1, 1972, engages in a gainful occupation, the board shall reduce the portion of his or her monthly retirement allowance that is not provided by his or her accumulated contributions, to an amount, which when added to the compensation earned monthly by him or her, does not exceed the amount of the compensation that would be earnable by a person holding the same or an equal position as or to that which he or she held at the time of his or her retirement, and in the same salary step or rating, or if no such position then exists, the compensation earnable immediately prior to its abolition.

(b) If his or her earnings are further altered, the board shall further alter that portion of his or her retirement allowance to the lower of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of that portion of his or her retirement allowance as it would be if not reduced under this section.

(2) An amount that, when added to the compensation earned by him or her, equals the amount of the compensation that would be earnable by a person holding the same or an equal position as or to that which he or she held at the time of his or her retirement, and in the same salary step or rating, or if no such position then exists, the compensation earnable immediately prior to its abolition.

(c) For purposes of this section, the retirement allowance subject to adjustment is the unmodified allowance irrespective of the option elected.

(d) When he or she attains the age of 55 years, his or her retirement allowance shall be made equal to the amount it would be if not reduced under this section, and may not again be modified under this section. Section 24015 does not apply to those persons affected by this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23401.

The board may require any member who retired for disability, prior to July 1, 1972, and who has not attained 58 years of age, to undergo a medical examination. If the examination, together with other available information, shows to the satisfaction of the board that the member is no longer disabled, the retirement allowance shall be terminated. Should any member retired for disability refuse to submit to medical examination, as provided in this section, the disability retirement allowance shall be terminated and all rights of the member in the disability retirement allowance shall be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23402.

Benefits payable on account of deaths that occurred prior to July 1, 1972, and provided under former Section 14193, as it read prior to July 1, 1972, shall be continued. Former Sections 14195 and 14196 as they read prior to that date shall continue to apply to these payments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23403.

Survivor benefits payable on account of deaths that occurred prior to July 1, 1972, shall be continued in the amounts and under the conditions stated in former Sections 14186 and 14189, as they read prior to July 1, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 52.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23404.

Upon termination of the retirement allowance that began to accrue prior to July 1, 1972, the member’s individual account shall be credited with amounts that are the actuarial equivalents at that time, as based on the disabled life, where retirement had been for disability, or on the active life where the retirement had been for service of the allowance and annuities being paid from accumulated retirement contributions, accumulated annuity deposit contributions, or accumulated tax-sheltered annuity contributions. These credited amounts shall not exceed the amount of his or her accumulated contributions as they were in those accounts at the date of retirement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 21.5. Election of Disability and Death Benefit Coverage [23700. - 23706.]

23700.

(a) New survivor benefit and disability retirement programs that are provided under the Defined Benefit Program pursuant to Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850) and Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 24100), are effective as of October 16, 1992. All members of the Defined Benefit Program with an effective date of membership in the program on or after October 16, 1992, shall be covered by these survivor benefit and disability retirement programs under this part.

(b) The
 purpose of this chapter is to set forth the criteria for granting certain members of the Defined Benefit Program, as defined in Section 23702, the opportunity to elect to either retain coverage under the current family allowance and disability allowance programs pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 23800), and Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 24001) or to be covered under the survivor benefit and disability retirement programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23701.

(a) The election of disability and death benefit programs shall be made during the 180-day period commencing on October 16, 1992, and ending on April 13, 1993. All elections made during this period shall be effective as of October 16, 1992.

(b) If a member has made an election and subsequently becomes disabled or dies, the benefits shall be paid under the elected program provisions as though the election had been executed on October 16, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23702.

(a) All members in the Defined Benefit Program on October 15, 1992, who are not receiving a disability allowance or a retirement allowance with an effective date prior to October 16, 1992, shall be eligible to make an irrevocable election, pursuant to this chapter, to retain coverage under either the disability allowance and family allowance programs or to have coverage under the disability retirement and survivor benefits programs.

(b) The member’s eligibility to participate in
 the election shall be based on the member’s status in the Defined Benefit Program on October 15, 1992, only, and not on prior or subsequent events.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 939, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23703.

A member’s election of disability or death benefit coverage shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The member is eligible to participate in the election pursuant to Section 23702.

(b) The election is filed on a form provided by the system.

(c) Except as provided in Section 23704, the election document contains the signature of the spouse of the member, unless
 the member declares, in writing, under penalty of perjury, that one of the following conditions exists:

(1) The member does not know, and has taken all reasonable steps to determine, the whereabouts of the spouse.

(2) The spouse is incapable of executing the acknowledgment because of an incapacitating mental or physical condition.

(3) The member and spouse have executed a marriage settlement agreement pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Family Code that makes the community property law inapplicable to the marriage.

(4) The member is not married.

(5) The current spouse has no identifiable community property interest in future benefits.

(d) The election document is signed and dated during the 180-day election period specified in Section 23701.

(e) The signatures of the member and the member’s spouse on the election document are witnessed by a third party who is at least 18 years of age.

(f) The election document is received in the system’s office in Sacramento within 30 days after the date of signature, but no later than May 1, 1993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 933, Sec. 55.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23704.

If a spouse refuses to sign the election document, the member may bring an action in court to enforce the spousal signature requirement or to waive the spousal signature requirement. Either party may bring an action pursuant to Section 1101 of the Family Code to determine the rights of the party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23705.

After receipt of a member’s election document, the system shall mail an acknowledgement notice to the member that indicates the member’s choice of disability and death benefit programs. If the member does not agree with the system’s recording of his or her election choice, the member has 30 days from the date of the acknowledgement notice to notify the system in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23706.

(a) Failure to file an election pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be an election to retain coverage under the disability allowance and family allowance programs.

(b) Failure to meet all of the requirements for submitting an election pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be a failure to file an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 22. Active Death Benefits: Family Allowance [23800. - 23812.]

23800.

(a) This chapter governs the eligibility provisions, benefit provisions, allowance computations, and related provisions for the benefits payable under this part with respect to the Defined Benefit Program upon the death of eligible members. “Members,” as used in this chapter, means all members who were receiving a disability allowance on October 15, 1992, and all persons who were members of the plan under this part on October 15, 1992, who were not receiving an allowance and who did not elect, pursuant to Chapter 21.5 (commencing with Section 23700), to be covered under Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850).

(b) This chapter also contains three sections related to survivor benefits payable on account of deaths that occurred prior to July 1, 1972.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23801.

(a) A death payment of no less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be paid to the beneficiary upon receipt of proof of death of a member who had one or more years of credited service, including service deemed to the member under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22851, at least one of which had been earned subsequent to the most recent refund of accumulated retirement contributions, if the member died during any one of the following periods:

(1) While in employment for which creditable compensation is paid.

(2) While disabled, if the disability had been continuous from the last day
 for which creditable compensation had been paid.

(3) Within four months after termination of creditable service or termination of employment, whichever occurs first.

(4) Within four months after termination of a disability allowance if no service was performed after the termination.

(5) Within 12 months of the last day for which creditable compensation was paid, if the member was on an approved leave of absence without compensation for reasons other than disability.

(6) While on a leave of absence to perform qualified military service, if the death occurred on or after January 1, 2007.

(b) A death payment
 pursuant to this section shall not be payable for the death of a member that occurs within one year commencing with the effective date of reinstatement from service retirement pursuant to Section 24208.

(c) The board may adjust the death payment amount following each actuarial valuation based on changes in the All Urban California Consumer Price Index and adopt any adjusted amount as a plan amendment.

(d) A beneficiary may waive his or her right to the death payment in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to or on behalf of the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 5.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.

(a) Upon receipt of proof of death of a member who has no preretirement option in effect, and who either does not meet the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 23804, or meets the eligibility requirements set forth in Section 23804 but has no eligible survivors for a family allowance as specified in Section 23805 or 23806, there shall be paid to the beneficiary both of the following:

(1) The accumulated retirement contributions after July 1, 1935.

(2) The accumulated annuity deposit contributions.

(b) Accumulated contributions include credited interest through the
 date of payment.

(c) A beneficiary may waive the right to the lump-sum payment pursuant to this section in accordance with the requirements established by the system. The waiver shall be submitted on a properly executed form prescribed by the system. The filing of a waiver by a beneficiary constitutes a complete and immediate discharge of all obligations of the board, the system, or the plan to, or on behalf of, the beneficiary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 416, Sec. 12.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23803.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13100) of Part 1 of Division 8 of the Probate Code, or any other provision of law, death payments and return of contributions pursuant to Sections 23801 and 23802, if any, may be requested by the beneficiary and paid by the system as soon as practicable after receipt of proof of death.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

23804.
